Massachusetts, session 194th, H3778.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 7 of Chapter 90 is hereby amended by inserting: 
All new automobiles sold in the Commonwealth after January 1, 2028, shall be equipped 
with adaptive beam headlight technology, as authorized by the amendment to the Federal Motor 
Vehicle Safety Standard No. 108 by the U.S. Department of Transportation’s National Highway 
Traffic Safety Administration.